Wyoming statutes. Title 28 Legislature
Chapter 5 Compensation of Members

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions on compensation of members of legislature, see art. 3, §§ 6 and 9, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d States, Territories and Dependencies § 58.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 46, 47.

§ 28-5-101.
Schedule of compensation, per diem and travel expenses.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 202.

The amount to be received by each member of the legislature for expenses shall be one hundred nine dollars ($109.00) per day.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 51, § 2.

Each member of the legislature shall receive one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) per day as salary in addition to the mileage rate provided for in this subsection. Each member of the legislature may receive the mileage rate provided for in this subsection for the total round trip mileage from Cheyenne to the legislator’s home for not more than one (1) trip each week during the period the legislature is in session, provided the legislature is in session for a period of not less than two (2) weeks and the legislator claiming the mileage reimbursement shall submit a verified claim for mileage to the legislative service office. Each member of the legislature shall receive a mileage rate as established by the state auditor to be reflective of the average of all direct and indirect costs of driving a motor vehicle. In establishing the mileage rate the state auditor:

May use a rate established by another entity if the rate reflects these costs;

Shall adjust the rate each year on January 1;

Shall not establish the rate at an amount exceeding the maximum nontaxable rates allowed by the internal revenue service at the time of travel.

During the interim each member of the legislature shall be paid the following amounts, subject to subsection (f) of this section:

The full daily statutory salary for four (4) days per month for floor leaders and committee chairmen, six (6) days for the speaker of the house and the president of the senate, and two (2) days per month for all other members of the legislature for each month the legislature is not in session;

The full daily statutory salary for each day the member is engaged in work for the management council, a standing committee, interim committee, select committee or a committee authorized by law;

One-half (1/2) the full daily statutory salary for one (1) day of preparation for each day the member is engaged in work for the management council, a standing committee, interim committee, select committee or a committee authorized by law to allow the member to prepare for the interim activity;

One-half (1/2) the full daily statutory salary for each day during which the member travels to engage in or returns from an interim activity for which he is entitled to receive salary under paragraph (ii) of this subsection;

Full daily statutory per diem, or actual expenses in lieu of per diem if authorized by management council policy, for each day during which he travels to engage in, return from or engages in an interim activity for which he is entitled to receive salary under paragraph (ii) of this subsection, or an activity approved by the management council or the chairman of an interim committee of which he is a member; and

Statutory mileage for necessary travel to attend and return from an approved interim activity.

Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, no member of the legislature shall receive a salary in any month the legislature is not in session in excess of the amount equal to the full daily statutory salary multiplied by the number of days in that month.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 5, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 34; Laws 1907, ch. 101, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 33; C.S. 1920, § 36; Laws 1921, ch. 95, § 30; R.S. 1931, § 64-501; Laws 1933, ch. 21, § 1; 1941, ch. 30, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 17-401; Laws 1949, ch. 29, § 1; 1957, ch. 3, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 28-42; Laws 1963, ch. 11, § 1; 1967, ch. 176, § 1; 1973, ch. 40, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 3, § 1; 1981, ch. 65, § 1; 1983, ch. 182, § 1; 1991, ch. 244, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 95, § 2; ch. 219, § 1; 2008 ch. 68, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 129, §§ 201, 202; 2016 ch. 51, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2002 amendment,

effective January 3, 2005, in (b) added “and to eighty-five dollars ($85.00) per day effective January 3, 2005”; and added the final sentence in (d).

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment,
Laws 2005, ch. 217, § 1,
amends this section effective January 5, 2009, by adding the last sentence in (d), by rewriting (e); and by adding (f).

The second 2005 amendment, Laws 2005, ch. 219, § 1, amends this section effective July 1, 2005, in (d) added the last two sentences, which includes (d)(i) through (iii).

The 2008 amendment,

in (b), added “and to one hundred nine dollars ($109.00) per day effective April 1, 2008” at the end, and made a related change; and inserted “or actual expenses in lieu of per diem if authorized by management council policy,” in (e).

Laws 2008, ch. 68, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2011 amendment,

repealed former (a) pertaining to salary, expense and travel compensation for each member of legislature; in (b), substituted “shall be” for “is increased to forty-four dollars ($44.00) per day effective January 1, 1980, to sixty dollars ($60.00) per day effective January 1, 1983, to eighty dollars ($80.00) per day effective January 9, 1995, to eighty-five dollars ($85.00) per day effective January 3, 2005 and to,” and deleted “effective April 1, 2008” at the end; and in (d), deleted “From and after January 1, 1985, each member of the legislature shall receive seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per day as salary and thirty-five cents ($.35) per mile for necessary travel to attend and return from the legislature. From and after January 9, 1995, each member of the legislature shall receive one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125.00) per day as salary in addition to the mileage rate provided for in this subsection. From and after January 3, 2005” at the beginning, also deleted “From and after January 5, 2009” at the beginning of the present second sentence, and “From and after the first Monday in January, 2009” at the beginning of the present third sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, repealed former (c), which read: “The amount to be received by each member of the legislature for necessary travel is increased to twenty cents ($.20) per mile effective January 1, 1983.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2005, ch. 217, § 1, effective January 5, 2009, and ch. 219, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, both amended
§

28-5-101

. This section is set out as decided by the legislative service office.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 68, § 3, provides: “(a)
There is appropriated from the general fund to the legislative service office three hundred thirty-four thousand six hundred eighty-eight dollars ($334,688.00) to supplement legislative per diem for the period July 1, 2008, through June 30, 2010.

“(b)
There is appropriated from the general fund to the state auditor sixty-eight thousand dollars ($68,000.00) for the period July 1, 2008, through June 30, 2010, to be distributed as necessary to supplement per diem for any state board, commission, council, authority or other state entity whose rate of per diem is based upon the amount of per diem paid to state legislators.”

§ 28-5-102.
Computation of mileage.

In determining the mileage it shall be computed by the most direct highway route.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 22, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 35; C.S. 1910, § 34; C.S. 1920, § 37; R.S. 1931, § 64-502; Laws 1935, ch. 63, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 17-402; W.S. 1957, § 28-43; 2011, ch. 129, § 206.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the section, which read: “In determining the mileage it shall be computed by the nearest practical route, and for the purposes of this section the "nearest practical route" shall be construed to mean where the route is by railroad, it shall be by the most direct railroad route; where the route is by highway, it shall be by the most direct highway; where the route shall be partly by rail and partly by highway, then the route shall be by the most direct highway to the nearest railroad station and then by rail as above provided.”

§ 28-5-103.
Additional compensation of president of senate and speaker of house.

The president of the senate and speaker of the house of representatives, shall each receive three dollars ($3.00) per day for his services, in addition to his compensation as a member of the legislature, and shall receive no other compensation, perquisite or allowance whatever.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 5, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 36; C.S. 1910, § 35; C.S. 1920, § 38; R.S. 1931, § 64-503; C.S. 1945, § 17-403; W.S. 1957, § 28-44.

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1892).

§ 28-5-106.
Constituent service allowance.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 59, § 2.

Each member of the legislature is entitled to receive a constituent service allowance as provided under this section. This allowance is intended to defray expenses incurred by each member in providing service to and on behalf of their constituents, which services are in addition to attending sessions of the legislature, attending meetings of interim committees and engaging in authorized interim work for which salary, per diem and mileage is authorized by law. The allowance is subject to the following:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 37, § 2.

The allowance of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) per calendar quarter or fractional portion thereof that the member is in office shall be paid quarterly to all incumbent legislators.

History.

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 95, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 171, § 1; 2013 ch. 37, §§ 1, 2, effective February 14, 2013; 2014 ch. 59, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s note. —

Laws 2014, ch. 59, section 3, provides: “Any balance remaining in the constituent service allowance account on June 30, 2014, and any amount appropriated to the constituent service allowance account by legislation enacted in the 2014 budget session is reappropriated to the legislative service office to fund constituent service allowance payments for the period beginning July 1, 2014 and ending June 30, 2016.”

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the special revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence in (a).

The 2009 amendment,

in (a), in the second sentence, added “Until January 7, 2013” at the beginning and added
“as provided in paragraphs (b)(i) and (iii) of this section” at the end, and added the third sentence; in (b)(ii), added the second and third sentences; and added (b)(iv).

Laws 2009, ch. 171, § 2 makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 11, 2009.

The 2013 amendment,

deleted the third sentence “Until January 7, 2013, the legislative service office shall oversee and provide reimbursement from the account as provided in paragraphs (b)(i) and (iii) of this section.” in (a); repealed former (b)(i) through (b)(iii), which read: “(i) The allowance shall be paid quarterly from the constituent service allowance account upon submission by the legislator to the legislative service office of a claim form verifying that he is a member of the legislature and thereby entitled to the allowance under this section. To the extent funds appropriated for purposes of this section are not sufficient to pay vouchers, payment shall be made on a proportional basis. Legislators may request payment of less than the full amount of the allowance; (ii) The allowance shall be seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) per calendar quarter or fractional portion thereof that the member is in office. To the extent a member's entire quarterly amount is not paid in any quarter the member may claim previously unused amounts in subsequent quarters so long as the total amount paid the member in any calendar year does not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00). This annual amount shall otherwise be subject to the same conditions and restrictions as the quarterly allowance; (iii) Claim forms shall be submitted to the legislative service office not later than the last day of the month following the calendar quarter for which the allowance under this section is being claimed.”; and added “of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) per calendar quarter or fractional portion thereof that the member is in office” to the first sentence, and deleted the last sentence “To the extent funds appropriated for purposes of this section are not sufficient to pay the full quarterly allowance to all members, payment shall be made on a proportional basis.” in (b)(iv).

Laws 2013, ch. 37, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo Const. Approved February 14, 2013.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (a) which read: “There is created a constituent service allowance account. All interest earned on funds within this account shall be deposited in the account. After January 7, 2013, the legislative service office shall oversee and provide payment from the account as provided in paragraph (b)(iv) of this section”; and in (b)(iv), deleted “from the constituent service allowance account” preceding “to all incumbent.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”